dictsource/en_rules
.group e
            e            E
         X) e ($w_alt6+++  i:
         X) e ($w_alt3+++  @
            e'er         e@
       &Cr) e's (_       @z
        &C) e's (_S2i    z
        &c) e's (_S2i    Iz
        &f) e's (_S2i    s
        &g) e's (_S2i    Iz
        &k) e's (_S2i    s
        &p) e's (_S2i    s
        &r) e's (_S2i    z
        &s) e's (_S2i    Iz
        &t) e's (_S2i    s
        &x) e's (_S2i    Iz
       &ch) e's (_S2i    Iz
       &ph) e's (_S2i    Iz
       &sh) e's (_S2i    Iz
       &th) e's (_S2i    z
        XC) e (Be_       i:
            e (Bo_       'i:
            e (Boe_      'i:
         @) e (Cia_      'i:
            e (Cic_      E
            e (Cical     'E
            e (CiuB      i:
         &) e (_
       acB) e (_         %I
        XC) e (_N        i:
      vert) e (b         I
        @@) eble (_      @b@L
       cel) e (bra       @
            e (bria      i:
         t) ech (_       Ek
         m) e (chanic    I
        sp) e (cia       E
        sp) e (cies      i:
      depr) ec (L02      i:S
         _) e (cl        %I
         _) eccles (i    I2kli:z
            econo (m     Ik'0n@
            econo (mic   i:k@n'0
         _) eco (s       i:koU
         &) ecy (_       @s%i
            ee           i:
      coff) ee           I
            ee (m        'i:
         t) ee (n_       'i:
            eer          'i@3
        ch) eese         i:z
            eeze (@      i:z
         d) e (fault     i:
         _) e (ffac      %I
            e (ffec      %I
            e (ffic      %I
            e (ffica     E
            efier (_     I2faI3
            e (ful
         _) e (ffu       %I
        @@) efy (_       I2faI
         l) e (gal       i:
         l) egi (b       EdZ@
         r) e (gal       i:
       int) e (ge        I
         X) e (gan_      i:
         @) e (gic       'i:
         l) egion        i:dZ@n
         l) e (git       @
         n) e (got       I2
       int) e (gra       I
         n) e (gro       i:
         &) eg (y        @dZ
            egy (pt      i:dZI
            eh (K        eI
         _) e (jA        %I
         v) ej (_        eI
            e (me_       i:
       _el) e (men       I
        @@) e (ment_
            e (meou      i:
         &) e (mum_      =@
        _C) e (mur       i:
         &) e (n         @
        &r) e (n         E
        Ah) e (n         E
        ll) e (nge       I
            e (o         I2
        cr) e (pe+       E
         _) e (phem      %I
         _) epi          EpI
         _) epider       EpId'3:
         _) ep (isC      I2p
            ep (ox       I2p
        fr) e (q         i:
         _) e (qua       i:
            e (qual      i:
         _) e (quat      %I
        _s) e (que       i:
         _) equi (@      ,i:kwI#
         _) equ (in@     Ekw
         _) equi (p      %IkwI
         _) equ (it@     Ekw
            equiv (@     %IkwIv
         h) e (sion_     'i:
        @)  e (tio       i:
     discr) e (tion      E
            ew           ju:
        _s) ew           u:
?3       d) ew           u:
?3       n) ew           u:
?3       t) ew           u:
         j) ew (+        u:
         l) ew (+        u:
         r) ew (+        u:
            ew (_        ju:
        _s) ew (_        oU
            eway (_S3    weI
         j) ewe (l       u:@
            e (work
         @) ez (_        =Ez

.group ea
            ea           i:
         @) ea (_        i@
        Cs) ea (_        i:
         r) ea (_        'i@
         &) ea (bl       @
         &) eably        @bl%I
         &) ea (bili     @
        tr) ea (cher     E
         d) ead          Ed
         h) ead          Ed
         h) ea (dmA@     %E
         h) ea (dq       %E
        _l) eaded        EdI2d
         l) ea (den      E
         r) ea (dy       E
         r) ea (dily     E
         r) ea (died     E
         r) eadme        i:dmi:
        br) ea (d        E
       _dr) ea (d        E
        tr) ea (d        E
       spr) ea (d        E
       thr) ea (d        E
        st) ea (d        E
         d) ea (f        E
        br) ea (k        eI
        st) ea (k        eI
         w) eapo         Ep@
            eager        i:g3
         j) ea (lou      E
         &) eal (_       i@l
         z) ea (lo       E
         C) ea (lt       E
         m) ea (lt       i:
         f) ea (lt       i:
            eam (t_      Emp
            ean (_       i@n
            ea (nder     i:'a
         p) ean (_       'i@n
        _l) ea (mi       E
        XC) ea (n_       i:
            ear          i@3
         _) ear (l       3:
         _) ear (n       3:
            ear (th      3:
         b) ear          e@
         b) ear (d       i@3
         h) ear (d       3:
         h) ear (th      A@
         h) ear (k       A@
         h) ear (s       3:
         h) ear (t       A@
         l) ear (n       3:
         p) ear (l       3:
         s) ear (ch      3:
         t) ear (A       e@
        sw) ear          e@
         w) ear          e@
         w) ear (y       i@3
         y) ear (n       3:
            eas (an      Ez
            eas (en      Ez
            easo (n      i:z@
            easur        EZ3
        br) ea (s        E
            ease (@      i:s
         @) ea (tive     =i@
         d) ea (th       E
         f) ea (th       E
         h) ea (ther     E
        th) ea (t        i@
        th) ea (tri      i:a
        _b) ea (tri      i@
         l) eath         ED
        br) ea (th       E
        br) eath (e      i:D
        cr) ea (t        i:'eI
        gr) ea (t        eI
       thr) ea (t        E
         w) eath         ED
        sw) ea (t        E
            eau          oU
            eau (t       ju:
            eaux         oU
         h) ea (v        i:
        _h) ea (vi       E
         h) eavy         Evi
       end) ea (v        E
         C) ea (ven      E

.group ed
            ed (_$w_alt5++S2 d
        @@) ed (_S2dvei   d
        Ai) ed (_S2dve    d
        @C) ed (_S2dvei   d
        @c) ed (_S2vdei   t
        @d) ed (_S2dvei   I#d
?8      @d) ed (_S2dvei   Ed
       &ch) ed (_S2vei    t
       &sh) ed (_S2vei    t
      @Csh) ed (_         Ed
        @f) ed (_S2vdei   t
        @g) ed (_S1vi     d
        @k) ed (_S2vdei   t
        el) ed (_S2dv     d
       &en) ed (_S2v      d
        cl) ed (_S1v      d
        @p) ed (_S2vdei   t
      @@er) ed (_S2v      d
       @ss) ed (_S2dv     t
        @t) ed (_S2vdei   I#d
?8      @t) ed (_S2vdei   Ed
       @fr) ed (_S2v      Id
       eur) ed (_S2v      d
        yw) ed (_         Ed
        @x) ed (_S2vi     t
         y) ed (_S2v      d
     debut) ed (_S2       d
            edly (_      Idl%I
         c) ed (e_       'i:d
         p) ed (e_       i:d
         p) edal         Ed@L
        rs) ed (e        'i:d
         m) ed (ia       i:d
        _m) edia         i:di:@
        _m) ed (iat      i:d
         @) ed (ien      'i:d
         m) ed (io       i:d
         m) ed (iu       i:d
        @m) ediate       i:dI2@t
        cr) edib         EdIb
       @dr) ed (_        Id
         t) ed (i        i:d
        sw) ed           i:d
         h) ed (ral      'i:d
         h) ed (ron      'i:d
         h) ed (ra       'i:d
        _p) ed (iat      i:d
         @) ed (th_      @d
         @) edur         'i:dZ3
         &) ed (y        @d


.group ei
            ei           eI
         _) ei           aI
         c) ei           i:
         l) eice (st     E
            eich         aIx
            eigh         eI
         l) eigh         i:
        sl) eigh         eI
         k) eigh         i:T
         h) eigh (t      aI
            eighth       eItT
            eig (n       eI
            eig (er_     aIg
         n) eil          i:l
            ei (m_       aI    
         @) ei (n_       i:
            ei (nate     I
         @) ei (ne       i:
         b) eing         i:I2N
            eing (_S3    I2N      
            eir          e@
         _) eir          aIr
         w) eir          i@3
         l) ei (s        E
        th) ei (sC       i:I
        _s) eis (m       aIz
            eis (e       aIz
            ei (ster     aI
         f) ei (t_       I
         f) ei (te       I   // for 'add e' to 'forfeit' etc.
         h) ei (t_       aI
?!3         ei (ther     aI
            ei (th       i:
            ei (v        i:
            ei (z        i:

.group el
         _) el (A        %Il
         _) ele (ctro    %Il,E
         _) ele (ctrol   %IlE
         _) ele (ctron   ElE
         _) ele (g       ElI
         _) elem         ElIm
         _) ele (p       ElI
         _) el (er       El
        sk) ele (t       ElI#
         _) ele (va      ElI
            el (igi      'El
         _) elit         %Ili:t
         &) el (_        @L
         &) el (s_       @L
?8       &) el (_        El
?8       &) el (s_       El
            ela (_       'El@
         _) el (iot      El
            ella (_      'El@
        &C) eller (_     @l3
         t) eller (_+    El3
        &C) eler (_      @l3
         @) elli (_      'ElI
         &) elling       @lI2N
         &) eling        @lI2N
         &) ell (ous     @l
         &) el (ous_     @l
       cib) el (_        El
        xc) el (_        'El
       onn) el (_        'El
         p) el (_        'El
        &r) ell (_       @L
      dopp) el           @L
       all) el           El
       all) el (o        'El
         v) elop         'El@p
            elo (q       El@
         d) el (iv       @l
         f) el (ix       i:l
         s) el (ect      I2l
         _) ell (ip      %Il
         v) el (oc       @l
         t) el (p        @L
         _) else         Els
         j) elly         ElI
         &) el (ty_      @L


.group em
         _) em           %Em
         _) em (a        I2m
         &) em (a_       @m
         &) em (_        @m
         _) em (ac       i:m
            em (ail      i:m
         f) em (ale      i:m
         @) em (ber      'Em
            em (ana      Em
            emba (s      Emb@
            em (blem     Em
            em (bry      Em
            em (eral     Em
         _) em (e        I2m
            em (ery      Em
            em (i        Em
            em (issi     I2m
         _) em (it       I2m
            emm (e       Em
            emm (an      I2m
         _) em (o        I2m
            em (path     Em
            em (per      Em
            em (phas     Em
            em (pres     Em
            em (pti      Em
            em (pty      Em
            em (ul       Em
            em (uls      I2m
         h) em (o        i:m
         h) emorrh       Em@r
       sph) em           @m
       sph) em (e        'i:m
        _s) ema (nti     @ma
         &) em (y_       @m
       yst) em           @m
       yst) em (i        Em
